New Jersey, session 222, S962.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In the event that a state of emergency is declared due to the failure to enact a general appropriation law by the deadline prescribed by Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 2 of the New Jersey Constitution, the authority shall continue to fund safety inspections for existing transportation infrastructure, and for newly constructed transportation projects funded, in whole or in part, by the authority.  The commissioner shall designate appropriate employees as necessary to conduct safety inspections.  All State employees that have been designated as necessary to conduct safety inspections shall be considered essential personnel. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately